Utah statutes.
78B-6-1102.5.   Violation of order enjoining a nuisance.

A person who knowingly violates any judgment or order abating or otherwise enjoining a nuisance as defined under Section 78B-6-1101 is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 99, 2010 General Session

